Utah statutes.
73-18-4.   Board may promulgate rules and set fees.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall promulgate rules:

(a)  creating a uniform waterway marking system which shall be obeyed by all vessel operators;

(b)  regulating the placement of waterway markers and other permanent or anchored objects on the waters of this state;

(c)  zoning certain waters of this state for the purpose of prohibiting the operation of vessels or motors for safety and health purposes only;

(d)  regulating vessel operators who carry passengers for hire, boat liveries, and outfitting companies; and

(e)  regulating anchored, beached, moored, or abandoned vessels to minimize health, safety, and environmental concerns.

(2) (a)  The board may set fees in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for:

(i)  licensing vessel operators who carry passengers for hire; and

(ii)  registering:

(A)  outfitting companies; and

(B)  boat liveries.

(b)  The license and registration fees imposed pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) shall be deposited into the Boating Account created in Section 73-18-22.



Amended by Chapter 386, 2011 General Session

